Utah statutes.
48-3a-103.   Knowledge -- Notice.

(1)  A person knows a fact if the person:

(a)  has actual knowledge of it; or

(b)  is deemed to know it under Subsection (4)(a) or law other than this chapter.

(2)  A person has notice of a fact if the person:

(a)  has reason to know the fact from all the facts known to the person at the time in question; or

(b)  is deemed to have notice of the fact under Subsection (4)(b).

(3)  Subject to Subsection 48-3a-209(6), a person notifies another person of a fact by taking steps reasonably required to inform the other person in ordinary course, whether or not those steps cause the other person to know the fact.

(4)  A person not a member is deemed:

(a)  to know of a limitation on authority to transfer real property as provided in Subsection 48-3a-302(7); and

(b)  to have notice of a limited liability company's:

(i)  dissolution 90 days after a statement of dissolution under Subsection 48-3a-703(2)(b)(i) becomes effective;

(ii)  termination 90 days after a statement of termination under Subsection 48-3a-703(2)(b)(vi) becomes effective;

(iii)  participation in a merger, interest exchange, conversion, or domestication 90 days after a statement of merger, interest exchange, conversion, or domestication under Part 10, Merger, Interest Exchange, Conversion, and Domestication, becomes effective; and

(iv)  abandonment of a merger, interest exchange, conversion, or domestication 90 days after a statement of abandonment of merger, interest exchange, conversion, or domestication under Part 10, Merger, Interest Exchange, Conversion, and Domestication, becomes effective.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

